Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-29,112
Change to amendment of articles of organization or bylaws at meeting.

(1) No substantive change to the proposed amendment of the articles of organization or bylaws shall be made at the members' meeting at which the vote occurs.

(2) Subject to subsection (1) of this section, any amendment of the amendment need not be separately voted upon by the board of directors.

(3) The vote to adopt an amendment to the amendment is the same as that required to pass the proposed amendment.

Laws 2007, LB368, § 112.